Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.160

Counties with populations of from five thousand to less than ten thousand—Ordinance reenactment.

Any county with a population of from five thousand to less than ten thousand that had in effect on July 1, 1985, an ordinance or resolution authorizing and regulating the construction of owner-built residences may reenact such an ordinance or resolution if the ordinance or resolution is reenacted before September 30, 1989. After reenactment, the county shall transmit a copy of the ordinance or resolution to the state building code council.

[ 1991 c 363 s 16; 1989 c 246 s 7.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.